North Carolina, session 2025, SB96.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-357(b)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) Penalty. – In addition to interest for nonpayment of taxes provided by
G.S. 105-360 and in addition to any criminal penalties provided by law, the
penalty for presenting in payment of taxes a check or electronic funds transfer
that is returned or not completed because of insufficient funds or nonexistence
of an account of the drawer or transferor is twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or ten
percent (10%) of the amount of the check or electronic invoice, whichever is
greater, subject to a maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000). thirty-five
dollars ($35.00). This penalty does not apply if the tax collector finds that,
when the check or electronic funds transfer was presented for payment, the
drawer of the check or transferor of funds had sufficient funds in an account
at a financial institution in this State to make the payment and, by
inadvertence, the drawer of the check or transferor of the funds failed to draw
the check or initiate a transfer on the account that had sufficient funds. This
penalty shall be added to and collected in the same manner as the taxes for
which the check or electronic payment was given."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to checks or
electronic funds transfers presented for payment of taxes on or after that date.
*S96-v-1*